District of Columbia statutes.
38-901

Whole school-day sessions.

All children of school age being instructed in the schools of the District beyond the 2nd grade shall be given a whole school-day session.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 316, ch. 3446, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-2201.
1973 Ed., § 31-1101.